Alabama, session 2026rs, HB520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Legislature finds and declares that the
state must provide additional career and technical education
opportunities for Alabama students to help them prepare to
enter the workforce. In order to support these offerings, the
state must attract and retain the required number of career
and technical education instructors. Therefore, the
Legislature finds that the State Department of Education
should take steps to increase the number of career and
technical education instructors in the state. It is the intent
of this act to streamline the process to obtain a teaching
certificate for those educators who move to Alabama to teach
career and technical education and related courses.
Section 2. Section 16-23-3.2 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§16-23-3.2
(a) The State Board of Education shall establish an
expedited certification pathway for the issuance of a teaching
certificate by the State Superintendent of Education to a
qualified individual who seeks to teach career and technical
education (CTE) courses at a public high school in Alabama
Page 1

education (CTE) courses at a public high school in Alabama
HB520 Enrolled
when that individual has previously taught CTE courses or
their equivalent in another state.
(b) To be approved for an expedited CTE teaching
certificate, the applicant shall satisfy all of the following
requirements:
(1) Submit to the State Board of Education the required
application form and fees to obtain a teaching certificate.
(2) Hold a valid, active teaching certificate, or its
equivalent, obtained from another state and submit a copy of
the certificate with the application.
(3) Is recommended for certification by a local
superintendent of education.
(4) Successfully pass a criminal history background
check.
(c) Upon verification that an applicant satisfies the
requirements of subsection (b), the State Superintendent of
Education shall issue an Alabama teaching certificate
authorizing the individual to teach CTE courses as soon as
practicable and shall not require any additional testing,
coursework, or documentation prior to issuance.
(d) Any teaching certificate issued in accordance with
the requirements of this section shall have the same term and
renewal requirements as all other standard teaching
certificates issued under this chapter.
(e) An individual who is granted a teaching certificate
pursuant to this section may only teach CTE courses.
(f) A local board of education, in its discretion and
subject to available funds, may provide a relocation stipend
Page 2

subject to available funds, may provide a relocation stipend
HB520 Enrolled
or hiring incentive to an individual certified under this
section who moves to Alabama from another state to teach CTE
courses.
(g) The State Superintendent of Education shall keep a
record of the number of certificates issued annually under
this section and shall submit a report to the Governor, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate by February 1 of each year which
provides information on the number of certificates issued, the
schools where these certificate holders are teaching, and the
efficacy of the program.
(h) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement and administer this section.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB520 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk




100
101 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
102
103
104
Page 4